test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jeall_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jeäll u-stem dlo: # Noun - full paradigm
     jeäll+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: jeäll
     jeäll+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: jeäl
     jeäll+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: jeäl
     jeäll+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: jiâlˈlu
     jeäll+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: jeälast
     jeäll+N+Sg+Com+Indef: jeälain
     jeäll+N+Ess+Indef: jeällan
     jeäll+N+Par+Indef: jeällad
     jeäll+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [jeältaa, jeältää]
     jeäll+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: jeäl
     jeäll+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: jeälai
     jeäll+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: jeälaid
     jeäll+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: jeälaid
     jeäll+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: jeälain
     jeäll+N+Pl+Com+Indef: jeälaivuiʹm
     jeäll+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [jeälaitaa, jeälaitää]
